Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-526
Enterprise project; designation.

The commission shall determine which proposed information technology projects are enterprise projects. The commission shall create policies and procedures for the designation of such projects. The commission shall evaluate designated enterprise project plans as authorized in section 86-528.

Laws 1996, LB 1190, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 1349, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 81-1194;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 296;

Laws 2008, LB823, § 7.